Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-339
Street improvement; county aid; when authorized.

The county board of any county in which any city or cities are located having at least twenty-five thousand inhabitants but fewer than one hundred thousand inhabitants as determined by the most recent federal decennial census or the most recent revised certified count by the United States Bureau of the Census is hereby authorized and empowered, whenever the road fund or funds of such county will warrant it, to aid in the grading, paving, or otherwise improving of any street, avenue, or boulevard leading into such city and within the corporate limits thereof, by providing for the payment of not exceeding one-half of the cost of such grading, and not exceeding the cost of the paving of intersections. It shall also be authorized and empowered to grade, pave, or otherwise improve any street, avenue, boulevard, or road, or any portion thereof leading into or adjacent to any such city outside, or partly inside and partly outside the corporate limits thereof, including any portion thereof leading into or across any village or town, and for such improvements outside of the corporate limits of any such city as herein authorized and directed.

Laws 1911, c. 25, § 1, p. 171;

R.S.1913, § 1111;

C.S.1922, § 1045;

C.S.1929, § 26-739;

R.S.1943, § 23-339;

Laws 2019, LB67, § 6.